Tennessee, session 114, SB2203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-306(j)(1)(B), is amended by
inserting the language "to the department" immediately preceding the language "that the
participant's electronic device".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2203
012337
- 1 -